Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 6. Renewals, Continuing Education, and Fees

§ 661.
Renewal of license.

Licenses and registrations shall be renewed every two years on a schedule determined by the Office of Professional Regulation.

No continuing education reporting is required at the first biennial license renewal date following licensure.

The Board may waive continuing education requirements for licensees who are on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces.

Dentists.

To renew a license, a dentist shall meet active practice requirements established by the Board by rule and document completion of no fewer than 30 hours of Board-approved continuing professional education, which shall include an emergency office procedures course during the two-year licensing period preceding renewal.

Any dentist who has not been in active practice for a period of five years or more shall be required to meet the renewal requirements established by the Board by rule.

Dental therapists. To renew a license, a dental therapist shall meet active practice requirements established by the Board by rule and document completion of no fewer than 20 hours of Board-approved continuing professional education, which shall include an emergency office procedures course during the two-year licensing period preceding renewal.

Dental hygienists. To renew a license, a dental hygienist shall meet active practice requirements established by the Board by rule and document completion of no fewer than 18 hours of Board-approved continuing professional education, which shall include an emergency office procedures course during the two-year licensing period preceding renewal.

Dental assistants. To renew a registration, a dental assistant shall meet the requirements established by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.

§ 662.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application

Dentist $ 250.00 (B) Dental therapist $ 185.00 (C) Dental hygienist $ 175.00 (D) Dental assistant $ 70.00

Click to view

Biennial renewal

Dentist $ 575.00 (B) Dental therapist $ 270.00 (C) Dental hygienist $ 215.00 (D) Dental assistant $ 90.00

Click to view

The licensing fee for a dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist or the registration fee for a dental assistant who is otherwise eligible for licensure or registration and whose practice in this State will be limited to providing pro bono services at a free or reduced-fee clinic or similar setting approved by the Board shall be waived.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016;

2019, No. 70

, § 15.

§ 663.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.